Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2944
Districts and delegates; classes of members.

(1) The articles of organization or bylaws may provide:

(a) For the formation of districts and the conduct of members' meetings by districts and that elections of directors may be held at district meetings; or

(b) That districts may elect district delegates to represent and vote for the district in annual and special meetings of members.

(2) A delegate selected under subdivision (1)(b) of this section has one vote subject to subsection (3) of this section.

(3) The articles of organization or bylaws may provide additional voting power be allocated to each district, group, or class or delegate for the aggregate of the number of patron members in each district, group, or class as provided under section 21-2941.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 44.